core/src/test/resources/fixtures/mini-kir/apertium-mini.mini.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%<n%>      ! Noun
%<nom%>    ! Nominative
%<pl%>     ! Plural
%{A%}      ! back/front archiphoneme

LEXICON Root
Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns
ат:ат N ;       ! horse
ким:ким N ;     ! who

LEXICON N
%<n%>%<nom%>:%>%{A%} # ;
%<n%>%<pl%>:%>лар # ;
